California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) If the board determines that the applicant and the premises for which application for a license is made qualify for a license under Section 4190, the executive officer of the board shall issue a license authorizing the clinic to which it is issued to purchase drugs at wholesale pursuant to Section 4190. The license shall be renewed annually upon payment of a renewal fee prescribed in subdivision (s) of Section 4400 and shall not be transferable. As part of the renewal process the consulting pharmacist shall certify compliance with the quarterly inspections as required in Section 4192. Further, as part of the renewal process of every odd-numbered year, the most recent self-assessment form completed as provided in Section 4192 shall also be provided to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 470, Sec. 6.   (AB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4205.

(a) A license issued pursuant to Section 4110, 4120, 4160, or 4161 shall be considered a license within the meaning of Section 4141.

(b) The board may, in its discretion, issue a license to any person authorizing the sale and dispensing of hypodermic syringes and needles for animal use.

(c) The application for a license shall be made in writing on a form to be furnished by the board. The board may require any information as the board deems reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of Article 9 (commencing with Section 4140) of this chapter.

(d) A separate license shall be required for each of the premises of any person who sells or dispenses hypodermic syringes or needles at more than one location.

(e) A license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(f) The board may deny, revoke, or suspend any license issued pursuant to this article for any violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4207.

(a) Upon receipt of an application for a license and the applicable fee, the board shall make a thorough investigation to determine whether the applicant is qualified for the license being sought. The board shall also determine whether this article has been complied with, and shall investigate all matters directly related to the issuance of the license that may affect the public welfare.

(b) The board shall not investigate matters connected with the operation of a premises other than those matters solely related to the furnishing of dangerous drugs or dangerous devices that might adversely affect the public welfare.

(c) The board shall deny an application for a license if the applicant does not qualify for the license being sought.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may request any information it deems necessary to complete the application investigation required by this section, and a request for information that the board deems necessary in carrying out this section in any application or related form devised by the board shall not be required to be adopted by regulation pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 6.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4208.

(a) At the discretion of the board, an intern pharmacist license may be issued for a period of:

(1) One to six years to a person who is currently enrolled in a school of pharmacy recognized by the board.

(2) Two years to a person who is a graduate of a school of pharmacy recognized by the board and who has applied to become licensed as a pharmacist in California.

(3) Two years to a foreign graduate who has met educational requirements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4200.

(4) One year to a person who has failed the pharmacist licensure examination four times and has reenrolled in a school of pharmacy to satisfy the requirements of Section 4200.1.

(b) The board may issue an intern pharmacist license to an individual for the period of time specified in a decision of reinstatement adopted by the board.

(c) An intern pharmacist shall notify the board within 30 days of any change of address.

(d) An intern pharmacist whose license has been issued pursuant to paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (a) shall return his or her license, by registered mail, within 30 days of no longer being enrolled in a school of pharmacy. The intern pharmacist license shall be canceled by the board. Notwithstanding subdivision (c), an intern pharmacist license may be reinstated if the student reenrolls in a school of pharmacy recognized by the board to fulfill the education requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 4200.

(e) A person who has not completed the experience requirements necessary to be eligible for the licensure examination may have his or her intern license extended for a period of up to two years at the discretion of the board if he or she is able to demonstrate his or her inability to exercise the privileges of the intern license during the initial license period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.

(a) (1) An intern pharmacist shall complete 1,500 hours of pharmacy practice experience before applying for the pharmacist licensure examination.

(2) This pharmacy practice experience shall comply with the Standards of Curriculum established by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education (ACPE) or with regulations adopted by the board.

(3) This pharmacy practice experience shall include 900 hours of pharmacy practice experience in a pharmacy as a pharmacist and shall include pharmacy practice experience in both a community and institutional pharmacy practice setting.

(b) An intern pharmacist shall submit proof of his or her pharmacy practice experience on board-approved affidavits, or another form specified by the board, which shall be certified under penalty of perjury by a pharmacist under whose supervision the experience was obtained or by the pharmacist-in-charge at the pharmacy while the pharmacist intern obtained the experience.
 Pharmacy practice experience earned in another state may be certified by the licensing agency of that state to document proof of those hours.

(c) An applicant for the examination who has been licensed as a pharmacist in any state for at least one year, as certified by the licensing agency of that state, may submit this certification to satisfy the required 1,500 hours of pharmacy practice experience, provided that the applicant has obtained a minimum of 900 hours of pharmacy practice experience in a pharmacy as a pharmacist and has pharmacy practice experience in both a community and institutional pharmacy practice setting. Certification of an applicant’s licensure in another state shall be submitted in writing and signed, under oath, by a duly authorized official of the state in which the license is held.

(d) An applicant for the examination who has graduated after January 1, 2016, from an ACPE accredited college of pharmacy or school of pharmacy recognized by the board shall be deemed to have satisfied the pharmacy practice
 experience requirements specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4210.

(a) A person who seeks recognition as an advanced pharmacist practitioner shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Hold an active license to practice pharmacy issued pursuant to this chapter that is in good standing.

(2) (A) Satisfy any two of the following criteria:

(i) Earn certification in a relevant area of practice, including, but not limited to, ambulatory care, critical care, geriatric pharmacy, nuclear pharmacy, nutrition support pharmacy, oncology pharmacy, pediatric pharmacy, pharmacotherapy, or psychiatric pharmacy, from an
 organization recognized by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education or another entity recognized by the board.

(ii) Complete a postgraduate residency through an accredited postgraduate institution where at least 50 percent of the experience includes the provision of direct patient care services with interdisciplinary teams.

(iii) Have provided clinical services to patients for at least one year under a collaborative practice agreement or protocol with a physician, advanced pharmacist practitioner, pharmacist practicing collaborative drug therapy management, or health system.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, if, as a condition of completion of one of the required criteria fulfillment of a second criterion
 is also required, that completion shall be deemed to satisfy this paragraph.

(3) File an application with the board for recognition as an advanced pharmacist practitioner.

(4) Pay the applicable fee to the board.

(b) An advanced pharmacist practitioner recognition issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for two years, coterminous with the certificate holder’s license to practice pharmacy.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations establishing the means of documenting completion of the requirements in this section.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 43.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4211.

(a) An applicant for renewal of an advanced pharmacist practitioner recognition shall maintain a current and active pharmacist license, and shall submit all of the following as part of the renewal:

(1) Application and payment of the renewal fees.

(2) (A) Proof satisfactory to the board that the licensee has completed 10 hours of continuing education pursuant to Section 4233.

(B) The 10 hours shall be in addition to the continuing education requirements necessary for a pharmacist license renewal pursuant to Section 4231.

(C) An advanced pharmacist practitioner shall retain documentation of completion of continuing education for four years.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board shall not require completion of continuing education for the first renewal cycle of an advanced pharmacist practitioner recognition.

(c) The board may issue an inactive advanced pharmacist practitioner recognition under any of the following conditions:

(1) The pharmacist’s license becomes inactive.

(2) The advanced pharmacist practitioner fails to provide documentation of the completion of the required continuing education.

(3) As part of an investigation or audit conducted by the board, the advanced pharmacist practitioner fails to provide documentation substantiating the completion of continuing education.

(d) The board shall reactivate an inactive advanced pharmacist practitioner recognition only if the advanced pharmacist practitioner pays the required renewal fees pursuant to Section 4210, submits satisfactory proof to the board of completion of the continuing education requirements under Section 4233, and meets all renewal requirements in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 44.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Continuing Education [4231. - 4234.]

4231.

(a) For purposes of this section, “cultural competency course” means a cultural competency and humility course that meets the following criteria:

(1) The course focuses on patients who identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, gender nonconforming, or queer, or who question their sexual orientation or gender identity and expression.

(2) The course is approved from an accreditation agency approved by the board.

(3) The course covers recognized health disparities faced by Black, Indigenous, and people of color.

(4) The course contains elements demonstrating how
 sexual identity is directly impacted through intersectionality.

(b) The board shall not renew a pharmacist license unless the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant has successfully completed 30 hours of approved courses of continuing pharmacy education, including at least one hour of participation in a cultural competency course, during the two years preceding the application for renewal.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the board shall not require completion of continuing education for the first renewal of a pharmacist license.

(d) If an applicant for renewal of a pharmacist license submits the renewal application and payment of the renewal fee but does not submit proof satisfactory to the board that the licensee has completed 30 hours of continuing pharmacy education, the board
 shall not renew the license and shall issue the applicant an inactive pharmacist license. A licensee with an inactive pharmacist license issued pursuant to this section may obtain an active pharmacist license by paying the renewal fees due and submitting satisfactory proof to the board that the licensee has completed 30 hours of continuing pharmacy education.

(e) If, as part of an investigation or audit conducted by the board, a pharmacist fails to provide documentation substantiating the completion of continuing education as required in subdivision (b), the board shall cancel the active pharmacist license and issue an inactive pharmacist license in its place. A licensee with an inactive pharmacist license issued pursuant to this section may obtain an active pharmacist license by paying the renewal fees due and submitting satisfactory proof to the board that the licensee has completed 30 hours of continuing pharmacy education.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 958, Sec. 4.   (AB 2194)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4232.

(a) The courses shall be in the form of postgraduate studies, institutes, seminars, lectures, conferences, workshops, extension studies, correspondence courses, and other similar methods of conveying continuing professional pharmacy education.

(b) The subject matter shall be pertinent to the socioeconomic and legal aspects of health care, the properties and actions of drugs and dosage forms and the etiology, and characteristics and therapeutics of the disease state.

(c) The subject matter of the courses may include, but shall not be limited to, the following: pharmacology, biochemistry, physiology, pharmaceutical chemistry, pharmacy administration, pharmacy jurisprudence, public health and communicable diseases, professional practice management, anatomy, histology, and any other subject matter as represented in curricula of accredited colleges of pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 621, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4232.5.

(a) A pharmacist who, pursuant to any authority of this chapter, prescribes a Schedule II controlled substance, shall have completed an education course on the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs.

(b) A pharmacist who has completed such a course within the last four years shall be deemed to have satisfied this requirement.

(c) This section shall become operative July 1, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 629, Sec. 25.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative July 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4233.

A pharmacist who is recognized as an advanced pharmacist practitioner shall complete 10 hours of continuing education each renewal cycle in addition to the requirements of Section 4231. The subject matter shall be in one or more areas of practice relevant to the pharmacist’s clinical practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 45.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4234.

The board may, in accordance with the intent of this article, make exceptions from the requirements of this article in emergency or hardship cases.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Poisons [4240. - 4240.]

4240.

(a) The California Hazardous Substances Act, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 108100) of Part 3 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, applies to pharmacies and pharmacists and any other person or place subject to the jurisdiction of the board.

(b) The board may enforce that act when necessary for the protection of the health and safety of the public if prior regulatory notice is given in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Board enforcement shall focus on those hazardous substances that relate significantly to or overlap the practice of pharmacy.

(c) “Poison” as used in this chapter refers to a category of hazardous substances defined in Section 108125 of the Health and Safety Code. The board may by regulation make the category more specific.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Disciplinary Proceedings [4300. - 4318.]

4300.

(a) Every license issued may be suspended or revoked.

(b) The board shall discipline the holder of any license issued by the board, whose default has been entered or whose case has been heard by the board and found guilty, by any of the following methods:

(1) Suspending judgment.

(2) Placing him or her upon probation.

(3) Suspending his or her right to practice for a period not exceeding one year.

(4) Revoking his or her license.

(5) Taking any other action in relation to disciplining him or her as the board in its discretion may deem proper.

(c) The board may refuse a license to any applicant guilty of unprofessional conduct. The board may, in its sole discretion, issue a probationary license to any applicant for a license who is guilty of unprofessional conduct and who has met all other requirements for licensure. The board may issue the license subject to any terms or conditions not contrary to public policy, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Medical or psychiatric evaluation.

(2) Continuing medical or psychiatric treatment.

(3) Restriction of type or circumstances of practice.

(4) Continuing participation in a board-approved rehabilitation program.

(5) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(6) Random fluid testing for alcohol or drugs.

(7) Compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of pharmacy.

(d) The board may initiate disciplinary proceedings to revoke or suspend any probationary certificate of licensure for any violation of the terms and conditions of probation. Upon satisfactory completion of probation, the board shall convert the probationary certificate to a regular certificate, free of conditions.

(e) The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein. The action shall be final, except that the propriety of the action is subject to review by the superior court pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4300.1.

The expiration, cancellation, forfeiture, or suspension of a board-issued license by operation of law or by order or decision of the board or a court of law, the placement of a license on a retired status, or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee shall not deprive the board of jurisdiction to commence or proceed with any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 799, Sec. 23.   (SB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.

The board shall take action against any holder of a license who is guilty of unprofessional conduct or whose license has been issued by mistake. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(a) Procurement of a license by fraud or misrepresentation.

(b) Incompetence.

(c) Gross negligence.

(d) The clearly excessive furnishing of controlled substances in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 11153 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) The clearly excessive furnishing of controlled substances in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 11153.5 of the Health and Safety Code. Factors to be considered in determining whether the furnishing of controlled substances is clearly excessive shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of controlled substances furnished, the previous ordering pattern of the customer (including size and frequency of orders), the type and size of the customer, and where and to whom the customer distributes its product.

(f) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, fraud, deceit, or corruption, whether the act is committed in the course of relations as a licensee or otherwise, and whether the act is a felony or misdemeanor or not.

(g) Knowingly making or signing
 any certificate or other document that falsely represents the existence or nonexistence of a state of facts.

(h) The administering to oneself, of any controlled substance, or the use of any dangerous drug or of alcoholic beverages to the extent or in a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to oneself, to a person holding a license under this chapter, or to any other person or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by the license.

(i) Except as otherwise authorized by law, knowingly selling, furnishing, giving away, or administering, or offering to sell, furnish, give away, or administer, any controlled substance to
 a person with substance use disorder.

(j) The violation of any of the statutes of this state, of any other state, or of the United States regulating controlled substances and dangerous drugs.

(k) The conviction of more than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any dangerous drug or alcoholic beverage, or any combination of those substances.

(l) The conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensee under this chapter. The record of conviction of a violation of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 801) of Title 21 of the United States Code regulating controlled substances or of a
 violation of the statutes of this state regulating controlled substances or dangerous drugs shall be conclusive evidence of unprofessional conduct. In all other cases, the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence only of the fact that the conviction occurred. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, in order to fix the degree of discipline or, in the case of a conviction not involving controlled substances or dangerous drugs, to determine if the conviction is of an offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a licensee under this chapter. A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this provision. The board may take action when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an
 order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(m) The cash compromise of a charge of violation of Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 801) of Title 21 of the United States Code regulating controlled substances or of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code relating to the Medi-Cal program.

(n) The revocation, suspension, or other discipline by another state of a license to practice pharmacy, operate a pharmacy, or do any other act for
 which a license is required by this chapter that would be grounds for revocation, suspension, or other discipline under this chapter. Any disciplinary action taken by the board pursuant to this section shall be coterminous with action taken by another state, except that the term of any discipline taken by the board may exceed that of another state, consistent with the board’s enforcement guidelines. The evidence of discipline by another state is conclusive proof of unprofessional conduct.

(o) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of or conspiring to violate any provision or term of this chapter or of the applicable federal and state laws and regulations governing pharmacy, including regulations established by the board or by any other state or federal regulatory agency.

(p) Actions or conduct that would have warranted denial of a license.

(q) Engaging in any conduct that subverts or attempts to subvert an investigation of the board.

(r) The selling, trading, transferring, or furnishing of drugs obtained pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code to any person a licensee knows or reasonably should have known, not to be a patient of a covered entity, as defined in Section 256b(a)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(s) The clearly excessive furnishing of dangerous drugs by a wholesaler to a pharmacy that primarily or solely dispenses prescription drugs to patients of long-term care facilities. Factors to
 be considered in determining whether the furnishing of dangerous drugs is clearly excessive shall include, but not be limited to, the amount of dangerous drugs furnished to a pharmacy that primarily or solely dispenses prescription drugs to patients of long-term care facilities, the previous ordering pattern of the pharmacy, and the general patient population to whom the pharmacy distributes the dangerous drugs. That a wholesaler has established, and employs, a tracking system that complies with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 4164 shall be considered in determining whether there has been a violation of this subdivision. This provision shall not be interpreted to require a wholesaler to obtain personal medical information or be authorized to permit a wholesaler to have access to personal medical information except as otherwise authorized by Section 56 and following of the Civil Code.
 For purposes of this section, “long-term care facility” has the same meaning given the term in Section 1418 of the Health and Safety Code.

(t) The acquisition of a nonprescription diabetes test device from a person that the licensee knew or should have known was not the nonprescription diabetes test device’s manufacturer or the manufacturer’s authorized distributor as identified in Section 4160.5.

(u) The submission of a reimbursement claim for a nonprescription diabetes test device to a pharmaceutical benefit manager, health insurer, government agency, or other third-party payor when the licensee knew or reasonably should have known that the diabetes test device was not purchased either directly from the manufacturer or from the nonprescription diabetes test device manufacturer’s
 authorized distributors as identified in Section 4160.5.

(v) Actions or conduct that would subvert the efforts of a pharmacist to comply with laws and regulations, or exercise professional judgment, including creating or allowing conditions that may interfere with a pharmacist’s ability to practice with competency and safety or creating or allowing an environment that may jeopardize patient care. This subdivision does not apply to facilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(w) Actions or conduct that would subvert the efforts of a pharmacist-in-charge to comply with laws and regulations, exercise professional judgment, or make determinations about adequate staffing
 levels to safely fill prescriptions of the pharmacy or provide other patient care services in a safe and competent manner. This subdivision does not apply to facilities of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(x) Actions or conduct that would subvert the efforts of a pharmacist intern or a pharmacy technician to comply with laws or regulations.

(y) Establishing policies and procedures related to time guarantees to fill prescriptions within a specified time unless those guarantees are required by law or to meet contractual requirements. This subdivision does not apply to facilities of the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 470, Sec. 7.   (AB 1286)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.1.

In order to ensure that the board’s resources are maximized for the protection of the public health and safety, the board shall prioritize its investigative and prosecutorial resources to ensure that pharmacists representing the greatest threat of patient harm are identified and disciplined expeditiously.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 35.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4301.5.

(a) If a pharmacist possesses a license or is otherwise authorized to practice pharmacy in any other state or by an agency of the federal government, and that license or authority is suspended or revoked, the pharmacist’s license shall be suspended automatically for the duration of the suspension or revocation, unless terminated or rescinded as provided in subdivision (c). The board shall notify the pharmacist of the license suspension and of his or her right to have the issue of penalty heard as provided in this section.

(b) Upon its own motion or for good cause shown, the board may decline to impose or may set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of and confidence in the pharmacy profession.

(c) The issue of penalty shall be heard by an administrative law judge sitting alone, by a committee of the board sitting with an administrative law judge, or by the board sitting with an administrative law judge, at the board’s discretion. A pharmacist may request a hearing on the penalty and that hearing shall be held within 90 days from the date of the request. If the order suspending or revoking the pharmacist’s license or authority to practice pharmacy is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall automatically cease. Upon the showing to the administrative law judge, board, or committee of the board by the pharmacist that the out-of-state action is not a basis for discipline in California, the suspension shall be rescinded.

If an accusation for permanent discipline is not filed within 90 days of the suspension imposed pursuant to this section, the suspension shall automatically terminate.

(d) The record of the proceedings that resulted in the suspension or revocation of the pharmacist’s license or authority to practice pharmacy, including a transcript of the testimony therein, may be received in evidence.

(e) If a summary suspension has been issued pursuant to this section, the pharmacist may request that the hearing on the penalty conducted pursuant to subdivision (c) be held at the same time as a hearing on the accusation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 878, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

The board may deny, suspend, or revoke any license where conditions exist in relation to any person holding 10 percent or more of the ownership interest or where conditions exist in relation to any officer, director, or other person with management or control of the license that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action against a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 36.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

(a) The board may report any violation by a nonresident pharmacy of the laws and regulations of this state, any other state, or of the United States, including, but not limited to, any violation of this chapter or of the regulations established by the board, to any appropriate state or federal regulatory or licensing agency, including, but not limited to, the regulatory or licensing agency of the state in which the nonresident pharmacy is a resident or in which the pharmacist is licensed.

(b) The board may cancel, deny, revoke, or suspend a nonresident pharmacy registration, issue a citation or letter of admonishment to a nonresident pharmacy, or take any other action against a
 nonresident pharmacy that the board may take against a resident pharmacy license, on any of the same grounds upon which such action might be taken against a resident pharmacy.

(c) If the home state pharmacy license of a nonresident pharmacy is canceled, revoked, or suspended for any reason, any license issued pursuant to Section 4112 or 4127.2 shall be immediately canceled, revoked, or suspended by operation of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 46.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.1.

If the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) cancels, revokes, or suspends an outsourcing facility’s registration for any reason, any license issued pursuant to Section 4129.2 shall be immediately canceled, revoked, or suspended by operation of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 37.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

The board may deny, revoke, or suspend any license issued pursuant to Section 4161 for any violation of this chapter or for any violation of Part 5 (commencing with Section 109875) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.

(a) Failure by any pharmacist to notify the board in writing that he or she has ceased to act as the pharmacist-in-charge of a pharmacy, or by any pharmacy to notify the board in writing that a pharmacist-in-charge is no longer acting in that capacity, within the 30-day period specified in Sections 4101 and 4113 shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(b) Operation of a pharmacy for more than 30 days without supervision or management by a pharmacist-in-charge shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(c) Any person who has obtained a license to conduct a pharmacy, who willfully fails to timely notify the board that the pharmacist-in-charge of
 the pharmacy has ceased to act in that capacity, and who continues to permit the compounding or dispensing of prescriptions, or the furnishing of drugs or poisons, in his or her pharmacy, except by a pharmacist subject to the supervision and management of a responsible pharmacist-in-charge, shall be subject to summary suspension or revocation of his or her license to conduct a pharmacy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 308, Sec. 58.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4305.5.

(a) A person that is licensed as a wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or veterinary food-animal drug retailer, shall notify the board within 30 days of the termination of employment of the designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager. Failure to notify the board within the 30-day period shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(b) A person that is licensed as a wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or veterinary food-animal drug retailer, that willfully fails to notify the board of the termination of employment of the designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager at its licensed place of
 business, and that continues to operate the place of business in the absence of the designated representative-in-charge or responsible manager for that place of business shall be subject to summary suspension or revocation of its license as a wholesaler, third-party logistics provider, or veterinary food-animal drug retailer at that place of business.

(c) A designated representative-in-charge of a wholesaler or veterinary food-animal drug retailer, or a responsible manager of a third-party logistics provider, who terminates his or her employment at the licensed place of business, shall notify the board within 30 days of the termination of employment. Failure to notify the board within the 30-day period shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 507, Sec. 29.   (AB 2605)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.5.

Unprofessional conduct for a pharmacist may include any of the following:

 (a) Acts or omissions that involve, in whole or in part, the inappropriate exercise of his or her education, training, or experience as a pharmacist, whether or not the act or omission arises in the course of the practice of pharmacy or the ownership, management, administration, or operation of a pharmacy or other entity licensed by the board.

(b) Acts or omissions that involve, in whole or in part, the failure to exercise or implement his or her best professional judgment or corresponding responsibility with regard to the dispensing or furnishing of controlled substances, dangerous drugs, or dangerous devices, or with regard to the provision of services.

(c) Acts or omissions that involve, in whole or in part, the failure to consult appropriate patient, prescription, and other records pertaining to the performance of any pharmacy function.

(d) Acts or omissions that involve, in whole or in part, the failure to fully maintain and retain appropriate patient-specific information pertaining to the performance of any pharmacy function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 777, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4306.6.

If the board disciplines a pharmacist-in-charge for the violation of a state or federal law or regulation committed by another person and the pharmacist-in-charge reported to the board that violation or suspected violation, the board shall use the report as a mitigating factor if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The pharmacist-in-charge did not engage, either directly or indirectly, in any conduct that violated any state or federal law or regulation pertaining to the practice of pharmacy.
